Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LOCAL NEWS TALENT PIPELINE PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Minnesota News Media Institute for a local news talent pipeline program, a statewide initiative to encourage Minnesotans to seek careers in journalism and local news operations and strengthen the capacity of Minnesota news outlets. Grant money must be used by the recipients to provide paid internships with Minnesota newspapers, television and radio broadcasters, and digital news platforms for individuals to gain experience in reporting, editing, media design, and other operational functions. To the extent practicable, Minnesota News Media Institute should seek a balanced geographic distribution of grants and allocation of grants across different news mediums. Minnesota News Media Institute must consult with local Minnesota-based news organization associations, including the Minnesota Broadcasters Association and Minnesota Newspaper Association, on the administration of the grant program. Minnesota News Media Institute may retain up to five percent of funding to cover administrative expenses of operating the grant program. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end